Mississippi, session 2026, HB802.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Board of Supervisors of Humphreys County, Mississippi, for the purpose of providing funding assistance in Cost Share Needs for projects more specifically described in Section 2 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027............................ ..................................................$ 10,600,000.00. SECTION 2.  The funding appropriated by this act is to provide assistance in Cost Share Needs for projects necessary to continue recovery efforts in response to the EF4 tornado that devastated areas of Humphreys County on March 24, 2023, which projects include: (a)  Existing debris removal (twenty-five percent (25%) cost share for cleanup); (b)  Repairs to damaged roads; (c)  Replacement of county equipment; (d)  Construction of a new county barn and fire station; (e)  Restoration of housing; (f)  Emergency 911 interoperability upgrades; and (g)  A community development center. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.